Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.220

Nursing professions—Marketing plan.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the workforce training and education coordinating board shall contract with a firm that has expertise in public relations and marketing to develop and execute a marketing plan about available training opportunities and jobs for certified nursing assistants, personal care aides, licensed practical nurses, licensed vocational nurses, and related nursing professions. The marketing plan must include targeted outreach to serve workforce needs in rural and underserved communities as well as long-term care facilities. Marketing materials containing information about educational and training opportunities should include both postsecondary degree and credential opportunities as well as apprenticeships and training opportunities provided as partnerships between employers and exclusive bargaining representatives.

[ 2023 c 126 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 126: See note following RCW 28B.50.800.